src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON TENS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
lovváád+A+Ord:lovváád X_EEMEED ; 

@U.Case.SgNom@kyeht:@U.Case.SgNom@kyeht LOGI ;    ! kyehtlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@kyeht:@U.Case.PlNom@kyevtih LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@kyeht:@U.Case.SgGen@kyevt LOGI ;   ! kyevtlovkuuđâ, kyevtlovkuuđâst, kyevtlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@kyeht:@U.Case.PlGen@kuovtij LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@kyeht:@U.Case.PlAcc@kuovtijd LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@kyeht:@U.Case.PlIll@kuovttijd LOGI ;  ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@kyeht:@U.Case.PlLoc@kuovttijn LOGI ;  ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@kyeht:@U.Case.SgCom@kuovttijn LOGI ;  ! kuovttijnluvvijnkuuđáin kuovttijnluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@kyeht:@U.Case.Ess@kyehtin LOGI ;       ! kyehtinlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@kulmâ:@U.Case.SgNom@kulmâ LOGI ;    ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@kulmâ:@U.Case.PlNom@kuulmah LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@kulmâ:@U.Case.SgGen@kuulmâ LOGI ;   ! kuulmâlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@kulmâ:@U.Case.PlGen@kuulmâi LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@kulmâ:@U.Case.PlAcc@kuulmâid LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@kulmâ:@U.Case.PlIll@kulmáid LOGI ;  ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@kulmâ:@U.Case.PlLoc@kulmáin LOGI ;  ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@kulmâ:@U.Case.SgCom@kulmáin LOGI ;  ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@kulmâ:@U.Case.Ess@kulmân LOGI ;       ! kulmânlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@nelji:@U.Case.SgNom@nelji LOGI ;    ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@nelji:@U.Case.PlNom@neeljih LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@nelji:@U.Case.SgGen@neelji LOGI ;   ! kuulmâlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@nelji:@U.Case.PlGen@neeljij LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlGen@nelji:@U.Case.PlGen@neljij LOGI ;   ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@nelji:@U.Case.PlAcc@neeljijd LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@nelji:@U.Case.PlIll@neljijd LOGI ;  ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@nelji:@U.Case.PlLoc@neljijn LOGI ;  ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@nelji:@U.Case.SgCom@neljijn LOGI ;  ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@nelji:@U.Case.Ess@neljin LOGI ;       ! kulmânlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@vitt:@U.Case.SgNom@vitt LOGI ;    ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.SgNom@vitt:@U.Case.SgNom@vit LOGI ;     ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@vitt:@U.Case.PlNom@viiđah LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@vitt:@U.Case.SgGen@viđâ LOGI ;    ! kuulmâlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@vitt:@U.Case.PlGen@viđâi LOGI ;   ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlGen@vitt:@U.Case.PlGen@viiđâi LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@vitt:@U.Case.PlAcc@viiđâid LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@vitt:@U.Case.PlIll@viiđâid LOGI ; ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@vitt:@U.Case.PlLoc@viiđáin LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@vitt:@U.Case.SgCom@viiđáin LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@vitt:@U.Case.Ess@vittân LOGI ;      ! kulmânlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@kutt:@U.Case.SgNom@kutt LOGI ;    ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.SgNom@kutt:@U.Case.SgNom@kut LOGI ;     ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@kutt:@U.Case.PlNom@kuuđah LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@kutt:@U.Case.SgGen@kuđâ LOGI ;    ! kuulmâlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@kutt:@U.Case.PlGen@kuđâi LOGI ;   ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlGen@kutt:@U.Case.PlGen@kuuđâi LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@kutt:@U.Case.PlAcc@kuuđâid LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@kutt:@U.Case.PlIll@kuuđâid LOGI ; ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@kutt:@U.Case.PlLoc@kuuđáin LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@kutt:@U.Case.SgCom@kuuđáin LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@kutt:@U.Case.Ess@kuttân LOGI ;      ! kulmânlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@čiččâm:@U.Case.SgNom@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@čiččâm:@U.Case.PlNom@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@čiččâm:@U.Case.SgGen@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@čiččâm:@U.Case.PlGen@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@čiččâm:@U.Case.PlAcc@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@čiččâm:@U.Case.PlIll@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@čiččâm:@U.Case.PlLoc@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@čiččâm:@U.Case.SgCom@čiččâm LOGI ; ! čiččâmluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@čiččâm:@U.Case.Ess@čiččâm LOGI ;     ! čiččâmlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@kähci:@U.Case.SgNom@kähci LOGI ;    ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@kähci:@U.Case.PlNom@käävcih LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@kähci:@U.Case.SgGen@käävci LOGI ;   ! kuulmâlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@kähci:@U.Case.PlGen@kavcij LOGI ;   ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlGen@kähci:@U.Case.PlGen@kaavcij LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@kähci:@U.Case.PlAcc@kaavcijd LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@kähci:@U.Case.PlIll@kavccijd LOGI ; ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@kähci:@U.Case.PlLoc@kavccijn LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@kähci:@U.Case.SgCom@kavccijn LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@kähci:@U.Case.Ess@kähcin LOGI ;       ! kulmânlovveenkuttân

@U.Case.SgNom@ohce:@U.Case.SgNom@ohce LOGI ;    ! kulmâlovkuttâ
@U.Case.PlNom@ohce:@U.Case.PlNom@oovceh LOGI ;  ! kuulmahlovehkuuđah
@U.Case.SgGen@ohce:@U.Case.SgGen@oovce LOGI ;   ! kuulmâlovkuuđâ, kuulmâlovkuuđâst, kuulmâlovkuutân also Loc, Ill
@U.Case.PlGen@ohce:@U.Case.PlGen@ovcij LOGI ;   ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlGen@ohce:@U.Case.PlGen@oovcij LOGI ;  ! kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâi, kuulmâiluvijku(u)đâiguin, also PlCom
@U.Case.PlAcc@ohce:@U.Case.PlAcc@oovcijd LOGI ; ! kuulmâidluuvijdkuuđâid
@U.Case.PlIll@ohce:@U.Case.PlIll@ovccijd LOGI ; ! kulmáidluvvijdkuuđáid
@U.Case.PlLoc@ohce:@U.Case.PlLoc@ovccijn LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin
@U.Case.SgCom@ohce:@U.Case.SgCom@ovccijn LOGI ; ! kulmáinluvvijnkuuđáin kulmáinluvvijnovttáin
@U.Case.Ess@ohce:@U.Case.Ess@ohcen LOGI ;       ! kulmânlovveenkuttân

muáddi:muáddi LOV ;




LEXICON LOGI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** pointing to tens (LOV) and numbers (ONES)
 LOV ; ! For whole tens
@U.Case.SgNom@lov:@U.Case.SgNom@lov ONES ;
@U.Case.PlNom@lov:@U.Case.PlNom@loveh ONES ;
@U.Case.SgGen@lov:@U.Case.SgGen@lov ONES ;
@U.Case.PlGen@lov:@U.Case.PlGen@luvij ONES ;
@U.Case.PlAcc@lov:@U.Case.PlAcc@luuvijd ONES ;
@U.Case.PlIll@lov:@U.Case.PlIll@luvvijd ONES ;
@U.Case.PlLoc@lov:@U.Case.PlLoc@luvvijn ONES ;
@U.Case.SgCom@lov:@U.Case.SgCom@luvvijn ONES ;
@U.Case.Ess@lov:@U.Case.Ess@lovveen ONES ;


LEXICON ONES  !!≈ * **@CODE@** to card and ord
CARDINAL ;
SHORTCARDINAL ;
ORDINAL ;

LEXICON CARDINAL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** this is 1-10
ohtâ:o^RVht^RCâ OHTA ;
kyehti:kyeht^RCi KYEHTI ;
kulmâ:ku^RVlmâ KULMA ;
nelji:ne^RVlji KYEHTI ;
vittâ:vi^RVtt4â VITTA ;
kuttâ:ku^RVtt4â VITTA ;
čiččâm:čiččâm CICCAM ;
käävci:käävc^RCi KYEHTI ;
oovce:oovc^RCe KYEHTI ;
love: LOVE ;

LEXICON SHORTCARDINAL
ohtâ+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:oovt NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
ohtâ+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:ovt NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
kyehti+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:kyevt NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
kulmâ+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:kulm NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
käävci+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:kävc NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
käävci+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:käävc NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
oovvce+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:ovc NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
oovvce+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:oovc NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;


LEXICON MISCNUM 			 !!≈ * **@CODE@**
pelnub:pel#nub num ;
lakknub:lakk#nub num ;
pelnubčyet:pel#nub#čyet num ;
pelnubčyeđe:pel#nub#čyeđe num ;
maŋgâ:ma^RVŋgâ KULMA ;
maŋgâčyet:ma^RVŋgâ#čyet CYETI ;
muáddičyet:muáddi#čyet CYETI ;
maŋgâlov:ma^RVŋgâ# LOV ;
muáddilov:muáddi# LOV ;
muáddi:muáddi KYEHTI ;
miljovn+Num:miljovn X_LITTER ;
čyetimiljovn+Num:čyeti#miljovn X_LITTER ;
tuhháátmiljovn+Num:tuhháát#miljovn X_LITTER ;
muáddituhháát+Num:muáddi#tuhháát X_POTTAAK ;



LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**   arabic as first part, 
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:»»»- SASCont ;
 +Cmp/Hyph+Der+Der/ahasas:-ahas ANOLASJ  ;
 +Cmp/Hyph:»»»- NAMAG ;
! +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:»»»- SAS ;
 +Der+Der/ivvaas+Sem/Dummytag:ivvá A_VUALAAS ;

! :-  NAMAT ;            ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
!                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
!                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
!+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-»»# SASCont ; !6-jahkásaš
+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! 3-
  

LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**: numeral as first part: duhatjienat,
                         !! logigielat, etc. 2nd part in affixes/adjectives.lexc
         NAMAG ;  ! duhatjienat, logigielat, etc. NAMAG derivs are
                  ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                  ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
         SAS  ;
+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! golmma-


LEXICON ORDINAL	  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
vuossâmuš+A+Ord+Der1+Der/Superl+A:vuossâ MUSj-SUF ; !sme has not Ord for this
vuosmuš+A+Ord:vuos MUSj-SUF "ensimmäinen" ;	!¢vuosmuin, vuosmust, vuosmui, vuosmuš   !MUSj-SUF gives vuosmuust
vuosmuš+A+Ord+Err/Orth:vuoss MUSj-SUF "ensimmäinen" ;	!
nubbe+A+Ord:nu^RVbbe  nubbecase ;		   
kuálmád+A+Ord:kuálmád ORDINALInfl ;	 
kuálmád+A+Ord+Err/Orth:kuálmâd SOOHAD ; ! D XY V
niäljád+A+Ord:niäljád ORDINALInfl ;	   
niäljád+A+Ord+Err/Orth:niäljâd ORDINALInfl ;	   
viiđâd+A+Ord:viiđâd ORDINALInfl ;		   
kuuđâd+A+Ord:kuuđâd ORDINALInfl ;		   
čiččâd+A+Ord:čičč5âd CICCADInfl ;	   
káávcád+A+Ord:káávcád ORDINALInfl ;	  
káávcád+A+Ord+Err/Orth:káávcâd ORDINALInfl ;	  
oovcád+A+Ord:oovcád ORDINALInfl ;	
kallaad+A+Ord:kallaad X_EEMEED ;
lovváád+A+Ord:lovváád X_EEMEED "kymmenes" ;
čuáđáád+A+Ord:čuáđáád X_EEMEED ; !D X VV
